North Carolina, session 2025, SB684.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Part 1 of Article 4 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 105-130.34A. Credit to endow qualified community foundations.
(a) Purpose, Definitions. – The purpose of this section is to promote philanthropic
investments in local community development programs and activities and to enhance the quality
of life for residents of the State by providing a tax credit for charitable gifts made by taxpayers
to endowed funds held by community foundations in North Carolina. The following definitions
apply in this section:
(1) Endowed fund. – A fund, including donor-advised funds, community
foundation affiliate funds, field-of-interest funds, agency funds, and
designated organizational funds, held by a qualified community foundation
that (i) benefits charitable causes in the State and (ii) is intended to exist in
perpetuity.
(2) Endowment gift. – An irrevocable contribution to an endowed fund held by a
qualified community foundation.
(3) Qualified community foundation. – An entity exempt from federal income
taxation under section 501(c) of the Code that meets all of the following
requirements:
a. It is organized by articles of incorporation in this State to serve the
State, one or more counties or municipalities in the State, or both.
b. It is comprised of permanent, component funds established by multiple
separate donors for the purpose of supporting broad-based charitable
interests that solely benefit some or all of the residents of the State.
Support, as required in this sub-subdivision, means providing grants
to at least two unaffiliated, tax-exempt organizations.
c. The board of directors is comprised of community representatives and
independent from another entity.
d. It complies with the guidelines established by the Department,
including compliance with reporting, data privacy, and certification.
*S684-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Qualified contribution. – An endowment gift to a qualified community
foundation for an endowed fund that qualifies as a charitable gift under section
170(c) of the Code.
(b) Credit. – Subject to the limitations in this section, a C Corporation that makes a
qualified contribution of at least one thousand dollars ($1,000) to an endowed fund of a qualified
community foundation during the taxable year is allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this
Part equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the qualified contribution. The aggregate amount of
credit allowed to a corporation in a taxable year under this section for one or more qualified
donations made during the taxable year, whether made directly or indirectly as an owner of a
pass-through entity, may not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). The credit may not be taken
for the year in which the donation is made but may be taken for the taxable year beginning during
the calendar year in which the application for the credit becomes effective as provided in
subsection (c) of this section.
(c) Application. – To claim the credit provided in this section, a corporation must file an
application with the Secretary for the credit. The application must be filed on or before April 15
of the year following the calendar year in which the qualified contribution was made. An
application is effective for the year in which it is timely filed. The Secretary may not accept late
applications under this subsection. The application must be on a form prescribed by the Secretary
and include any information required by the Secretary demonstrating that the qualified
contribution has met the conditions for the credit
(d) Substantiation. – A corporation claiming a credit under this section must maintain and
make available for inspection by the Secretary any records the Secretary considers necessary to
determine and verify the amount of the credit to which the corporation is entitled. The burden of
proving eligibility for the credit and the amount of the credit rests upon the corporation, and no
credit may be allowed to a corporation that fails to maintain adequate records or to make them
available for inspection.
(e) Ceiling; Use Allocation. – The total aggregate amount of all credits allowed to
taxpayers under this section and G.S. 105-153.12 for qualified contributions made in a taxable
year may not exceed twelve million five hundred thousand dollars ($12,500,000). The Secretary
shall, first, fully fund any prorated credits in accordance with subsection (f) of this section and,
second, if funds remain after fully funding prorated credits, reopen the application period for
credits under this section for which funds have become available. If the Secretary reopens the
application period and notwithstanding the application deadline in subsection (c) of this section,
the additional applications must be filed with the Secretary on or before October 15 of the year
following the calendar year in which the qualified contribution was made. The Secretary may not
accept late additional applications permitted under this subsection. The Secretary's
determinations based on additional applications timely filed in accordance with this subsection
are final.
(f) Reduction. – The Secretary shall calculate the total amount of credits claimed from
applications timely filed under subsection (c) of this section. If the total amount of credits claimed
for qualified contributions made in a calendar year exceeds this maximum amount, the Secretary
shall allow a portion of the credits claimed by allocating the maximum amount in credits in
proportion to the size of the credit claimed by each taxpayer. If a credit claimed under this section
is reduced as provided in this subsection, the Secretary shall notify the corporation of the amount
of the reduction of the credit on or before December 31 of the year following the calendar year
in which the qualified contribution was made. The Secretary's allocations based on applications
filed under subsection (c) of this section are final and shall not be adjusted to account for credits
applied for but not claimed.
(g) Limitation. – The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the amount of tax
imposed by this Part for the taxable year reduced by the sum of all credits allowable, except tax
payments made by or on behalf of the taxpayer.
Page 2 Senate Bill 684-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(h) Carryforward. – Any unused portion of a credit allowed in this section may be carried
forward for the succeeding five years.
(i) No Double Benefit. – A taxpayer who claims a credit under this section must add
back to taxable income any amount deducted under the Code for the qualified contribution.
(j) Sunset. – This section is repealed effective for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2030.
(k) Report. – The Department must include in the economic incentives report required by
G.S. 105-256 the following information:
(1) The number of individuals that took the credit allowed under this section.
(2) The total amount of credits claimed.
(3) The total amount of credits carried forward.
(4) Increases to endowed funds held by qualified community foundations.
(5) Capture of generational transfer of wealth for the benefit of NC communities
and organizations.
(6) Improvements to and support of community development programs, projects
and activities.
(7) The total cost to the General Fund of the credits taken."
SECTION 2. Part 2 of Article 4 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 105-153.12. Credit to endow qualified community foundations.
(a) Purpose, Definitions. – The purpose of this section is to promote philanthropic
investments in local community development programs and activities and to enhance the quality
of life for residents of the State by providing a tax credit for charitable gifts made by taxpayers
to endowed funds held by community foundations in North Carolina. The following definitions
apply in this section:
(1) Endowed fund. – A fund, including donor-advised funds, community
foundation affiliate funds, field-of-interest funds, agency funds, and
designated organizational funds, held by a qualified community foundation
that (i) benefits charitable causes in the State and (ii) is intended to exist in
perpetuity.
(2) Endowment gift. – An irrevocable contribution to an endowed fund held by a
qualified community foundation.
(3) Qualified community foundation. – An entity exempt from federal income
taxation under section 501(c) of the Code that meets all of the following
requirements:
a. It is organized by articles of incorporation in this State to serve the
State, one or more counties or municipalities in the State, or both.
b. It is comprised of permanent, component funds established by multiple
separate donors for the purpose of supporting broad-based charitable
interests that solely benefit some or all of the residents of the State.
Support, as required in this sub-subdivision, means providing grants
to at least two unaffiliated, tax-exempt organizations.
c. The board of directors is comprised of community representatives and
independent from another entity.
d. It complies with the guidelines established by the Department,
including compliance with reporting, data privacy, and certification.
(4) Qualified contribution. – An endowment gift to a qualified community
foundation for an endowed fund that qualifies as a charitable gift under section
170(c) of the Code.
(b) Credit. – Subject to the limitations in this section, an individual that makes a qualified
contribution of at least one thousand dollars ($1,000) to an endowed fund of a qualified
Senate Bill 684-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
community foundation during the taxable year is allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this
Part equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the qualified contribution. The aggregate amount of
credit allowed to an individual in a taxable year under this section for one or more qualified
donations made during the taxable year may not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). The
credit may not be taken for the year in which the donation is made but may be taken for the
taxable year beginning during the calendar year in which the application for the credit becomes
effective as provided in subsection (c) of this section.
(c) Application. – To claim the credit provided in this section, an individual must file an
application with the Secretary for the credit. The application must be filed on or before April 15
of the year following the calendar year in which the qualified contribution was made. An
application is effective for the year in which it is timely filed. The Secretary may not accept late
applications under this subsection. The application must be on a form prescribed by the Secretary
and include any information required by the Secretary demonstrating that the qualified
contribution has met the conditions for the credit
(d) Substantiation. – An individual claiming a credit under this section must maintain and
make available for inspection by the Secretary any records the Secretary considers necessary to
determine and verify the amount of the credit to which the individual is entitled. The burden of
proving eligibility for the credit and the amount of the credit rests upon the individual, and no
credit may be allowed to an individual that fails to maintain adequate records or to make them
available for inspection.
(e) Ceiling; Use Allocation. – The total aggregate amount of all credits allowed to
taxpayers under this section and G.S. 105-130.34A for qualified contributions made in a taxable
year may not exceed twelve million five hundred thousand dollars ($12,500,000). The Secretary
shall, first, fully fund any prorated credits in accordance with subsection (f) of this section and,
second, if funds remain after fully funding prorated credits, reopen the application period for
credits under this section for which funds have become available. If the Secretary reopens the
application period and notwithstanding the application deadline in subsection (c) of this section,
the additional applications must be filed with the Secretary on or before October 15 of the year
following the calendar year in which the qualified contribution was made. The Secretary may not
accept late additional applications permitted under this subsection. The Secretary's
determinations based on additional applications timely filed in accordance with this subsection
are final.
(f) Reduction. – The Secretary shall calculate the total amount of credits claimed from
applications timely filed under subsection (c) of this section. If the total amount of credits claimed
for qualified contributions made in a calendar year exceeds this maximum amount, the Secretary
shall allow a portion of the credits claimed by allocating the maximum amount in credits in
proportion to the size of the credit claimed by each taxpayer. If a credit claimed under this section
is reduced as provided in this subsection, the Secretary shall notify the corporation of the amount
of the reduction of the credit on or before December 31 of the year following the calendar year
in which the qualified contribution was made. The Secretary's allocations based on applications
filed under subsection (c) of this section are final and shall not be adjusted to account for credits
applied for but not claimed.
(g) Limitation. – The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the amount of tax
imposed by this Part for the taxable year reduced by the sum of all credits allowable, except tax
payments made by or on behalf of the individual.
(h) Carryforward. – Any unused portion of a credit allowed in this section may be carried
forward for the succeeding five years.
(i) No Double Bbenefit. – An individual who claims a credit under this section must add
back to taxable income any amount deducted under the Code for the qualified contribution.
(j) Sunset. – This section is repealed effective for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2030.
Page 4 Senate Bill 684-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(k) Report. – The Department must include in the economic incentives report required by
G.S. 105-256 the following information:
(1) The number of individuals that took the credit allowed under this section.
(2) The total amount of credits claimed.
(3) The total amount of credits carried forward.
(4) Increases to endowed funds held by qualified community foundations.
(5) Capture of generational transfer of wealth for the benefit of NC communities
and organizations.
(6) Improvements to and support of community development programs, projects
and activities.
(7) The total cost to the General Fund of the credits taken."
SECTION 3. This act is effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2025.
Senate Bill 684-First Edition Page 5